Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-811
Personal property; form of contract.

A contract for personal property may be made in any of the following forms:

(1) For the furnishing of specific personal property at specific prices;

(2) For the furnishing of personal property, according to the specifications, at a fixed rate for a minimum quantity, subject to furnishing a greater quantity at the same or a lesser rate; or

(3) For the furnishing of personal property, according to the specifications without a stated minimum at a rate stated, commonly known as a price agreement.

The form of the contract to be used in any case shall be subject to the discretion of the division.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 18, p. 709;

R.S.1943, § 81-162;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 11;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-162;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 11.